Nebraska, session 109, LB1149.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB1149 LB1149
2026 2026
Section 1. Section 73-302, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
73-302 (1) A state agency that seeks to enter into a contract
described in section 73-301 with a private entity shall submit the
following information to the Director of Administrative Services: (a) The
proposed contract, (b) a review of the long-term actual cost savings, (c)
the measurable goals for improving the quality of the service, and (d) an
assessment of the feasibility of alternatives within the agency to
contracting for performance of the service, and (e) any contracts entered
into by such private entity with United States Immigration and Customs
Enforcement.
(2) In calculating the cost savings under subsection (1) of this
section, the state agency shall project, for twelve months and for sixty
months, the following:
(a) Direct costs, including salary and fringe benefits;
(b) Indirect overhead costs which shall include only those costs
that can be attributed solely to the work in question and that would not
exist if the work were not performed by state employees. Indirect
overhead costs shall include the pro rata share of existing
administrative salaries and benefits, rents, equipment costs, utilities,
and materials;
(c) Any continuing or transitional costs that are directly
associated with contracting for the work, including unemployment
compensation and the cost of transitional services; and
(d) Additional costs of performance of the work by state employees,
including the salaries and benefits of additional staff performing
inspection, supervision, and monitoring duties and the cost of additional
space, equipment, and materials needed to perform the services.
Sec. 2. Original section 73-302, Reissue Revised Statutes of
Nebraska, is repealed.
-2-